Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.42
Subdivision real estate; sales of twenty-five or more lots.

Sections 81-885.33 to 81-885.40 shall not apply to sale or lease of real estate not pursuant to a common promotional plan to offer or sell twenty-five or more lots in a subdivision.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 42.